Utah statutes.
41-6a-702.   Left lane restrictions -- Exceptions -- Other lane restrictions
-- Penalties.
(1)  As used in this section and Section 41-6a-704, "general purpose lane"
means a highway lane open to vehicular traffic but does not include a
designated:
(a)  high occupancy vehicle (HOV) lane; or
(b)  auxiliary lane that begins as a freeway on-ramp and ends as part of the
next freeway off-ramp.
(2)  On a freeway or section of a freeway which has three or more general
purpose lanes in the same direction, a person may not operate a vehicle in the
left most general purpose lane if the person's:
(a)  vehicle is drawing a trailer or semitrailer regardless of size; or
(b)  vehicle or combination of vehicles has a gross vehicle weight of 12,001
or more pounds.
(3)  Subsection (2) does not apply to a person operating a vehicle who is:
(a)  preparing to turn left or taking a different highway split or an exit on
the left;
(b)  responding to emergency conditions;
(c)  avoiding actual or potential traffic moving onto the highway from an
acceleration or merging lane; or
(d)  following direction signs that direct use of a designated lane.
(4) (a)  A highway authority may designate a specific lane or lanes of travel
for any type of vehicle on a highway or portion of a highway under its
jurisdiction for the:
(i)  safety of the public;
(ii)  efficient maintenance of a highway; or
(iii)  use of high occupancy vehicles.
(b)  The lane designation under Subsection (4)(a) is effective when
appropriate signs giving notice are erected on the highway or portion of the
highway.
(5) (a)  Subject to Subsection (5)(b), the lane designation under Subsection
(4)(a) shall allow a vehicle with clean fuel special group license plates
issued in accordance with Section 41-1a-418 to travel in lanes designated for
the use of high occupancy vehicles regardless of the number of occupants to
the extent authorized or permitted by federal law or federal regulation.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the Department of Transportation may make rules to allow a vehicle with
clean fuel special group license plates issued in accordance with Section
41-1a-418 to travel in lanes designated for the use of high occupancy vehicles
regardless of the number of occupants to the extent authorized or permitted by
federal law or federal regulation.
(6)  A person who operates a vehicle in violation of Subsection (2) or in
violation of the restrictions made under Subsection (4) is guilty of a class C
misdemeanor.
